Utah statutes.
34A-7-105.   Violation of chapter -- Misdemeanor -- Injunction.

(1)  It is a violation of this part and a class C misdemeanor to operate a boiler or pressure vessel subject to this part if:

(a)  certification has been denied or suspended; or

(b)  the boiler or pressure vessel is knowingly operated while constituting a safety hazard.

(2) (a)  The Division of Boiler and Elevator Safety may bring a lawsuit in any court of this state to enjoin the operation of any boiler or pressure vessel in violation of this part.

(b)  The court may issue a temporary injunction, without bond, restraining further operation of the boiler or pressure vessel, ex parte.

(c)  Upon a proper showing, the court shall permanently enjoin the operation of the boiler or pressure vessel until the violation is corrected.



Amended by Chapter 155, 2006 General Session

